North Carolina, session 2025, HB99.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. G.S. 90-624 reads as rewritten:
"§ 90-624. Activities not requiring a license to practice.
Nothing in this Article shall be construed to prohibit or affect:
…
(9) A nationally certified reflexologist engaged in the practice of reflexology, who
has a current certification from the American Reflexology Certification Board
(ARCB) or its successor entity, or an individual who is a reflexology student
working to obtain certification from the ARCB or its successor entity under
the supervision of an ARCB-certified reflexologist. Provided, however, that
this exemption shall only apply to reflexology students who obtain
certification within 12 months of beginning the certification process. For the
purposes of this subdivision, "reflexology" means a protocol of manual
techniques, including thumb- and finger-walking, hook and backup, and
rotating-on-a-point, that are applied to specific reflex areas predominantly on
the feet and hands and that stimulate the complex neural pathways linking
body systems and support the body's efforts to function optimally."
SECTION 2. This act becomes effective October 1, 2025.
*H99-v-1*